Massachusetts, session 194th, H1803.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 221 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by striking section 3 and inserting in place thereof the following:-
Section 3. There shall be a clerk for the supreme judicial court for the county of Suffolk,
a clerk for the appeals court for the county of Suffolk, and two clerks for the superior court of
said county, one for civil and one for criminal business; and in each of the other counties a clerk
of the courts who shall act as clerk of the supreme judicial court, of the superior court and of the
county commissioners. The clerk for the supreme judicial court for the county of Suffolk, and the
clerk for the appeals court for the county of Suffolk, shall be elected by all of the voters
statewide. All of said officers shall hold office for six years beginning with the first Wednesday
of January following their election and until their successors are qualified.
of 1